District of Columbia statutes.
16-2339

Immunity for juveniles who are witnesses in juvenile proceedings.

(a)

Whenever a child, other than a child transferred for criminal prosecution pursuant to section 16-2307, who is called as a witness refuses on the basis of the privilege against self-incrimination to testify or provide other information in or ancillary to a delinquency proceeding brought under this chapter in the Family Division, and the person presiding over the proceeding communicates to the witness an order issued under subsection (c) of this section, the witness may not refuse to comply with the order on the basis of the privilege against self-incrimination. However, no testimony or other information compelled under the order (or any information directly or indirectly derived from such testimony or other information) may be used against the witness except in a proceeding for perjury, giving a false statement, or otherwise failing to comply with the order.

(b)

The Corporation Counsel may request an order under subsection (c) of this section when the testimony or other information may be necessary to the public interest, and the child called as a witness has refused or is likely to refuse to testify or provide other information on the basis of the privilege against self-incrimination.

(c)

When any child, other than a child transferred for criminal prosecution pursuant to section 16-2307, has been or may be called to testify or provide other information in or ancillary to a delinquency proceeding brought under this chapter in the Family Division, and the Corporation Counsel has made a request under subsection (b) of this section, the judge presiding over the proceeding shall issue an order requiring the child to give testimony or provide other information which was refused on the basis of the privilege against self-incrimination. An order issued pursuant to this subsection shall become effective as provided in subsection (a) of this section.

May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-118, § 2, 41 DCR 1637
1981 Ed., § 16-2339.